Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-420
Actuarial opinions; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 44-420 to 44-427:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Insurance; and

(2) Qualified actuary shall mean an individual who is a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries and who meets all requirements as determined by the director by rule or regulation.

Laws 1994, LB 978, § 7.